Washington statutes.
RCW 10.04.050

Jury—If demanded.

In all trials for offenses within the jurisdiction of a district judge, the defendant or the state may demand a jury, which shall consist of six, or a less number, agreed upon by the state and accused, to be impaneled and sworn as in civil cases; or the trial may be by the judge. When the complaint is for a crime or misdemeanor in the exclusive jurisdiction of the superior court, the justice hears the case as a committing magistrate, and no jury shall be allowed.

[ 1987 c 202 s 151; 1891 c 11 s 1; Code 1881 s 1890; 1875 p 51 s 2; 1873 p 382 s 188; 1854 p 260 s 174, part; RRS s 1927.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.

Charging juries: State Constitution Art. 4 s 16.

Convicted persons liable for costs and jury fees: RCW 10.46.190.

Right to trial by jury: State Constitution Art. 1 s 21.